test/src/morphology/N-saergj36_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - särǵ: # Noun (36) särǵ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     särǵ+N+Sg+Nom: särǵ
     särǵ+N+Sg+Gen: säre
     särǵ+N+Sg+Par: särge
     särǵ+N+Sg+Ill: särge
     särǵ+N+Pl+Gen: särgi
     särǵ+N+Pl+Par: särgi
     särǵ+N+Pl+Ill: [särgihe, särgi]
     särǵ+N+Pl+All: särile
